Connecticut, session 2026, HB05499.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) Numbers 278 and 286 of the
2 special acts of 1921 are repealed.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section